Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-622
Licensee; solicitor; prohibited from practice of law.

Nothing in the Collection Agency Act shall be construed to authorize or permit the holder of a license or the holder of a solicitor's certificate, as provided for in the act, to engage in the practice of law.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 26, p. 1603;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,183;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 20.